Ohio, session 136, HB294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 3313.97 of the Revised Code be 4
amended to read as follows: 5
Sec. 3313.97. Notwithstanding division (D) of section 6
3311.19 and division (D) of section 3311.52 of the Revised Code, 7
this section does not apply to any joint vocational or 8
cooperative education school district. 9
(A) As used in this section: 10
(1) "Parent" has the same meaning as in section 3313.64 of 11
the Revised Code. 12
(2) "Alternative school" means a school building other 13
than the one to which a student is assigned by the district 14
superintendent. 15
(3) "IEP" has the same meaning as in section 3323.01 of 16
the Revised Code. 17

H. B. No. 294 Page 2
As Introduced
(B) The board of education of each city, local, and 18
exempted village school district shall adopt an open enrollment 19
policy allowing students entitled to attend school in the 20
district pursuant to section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised 21
Code to enroll in an alternative school. Each policy shall 22
provide for the following: 23
(1) Application procedures, including deadlines timelines 24
for application and for notification of students and principals 25
of alternative schools whenever a student's application is 26
accepted. The policy shall require a student to apply only if 27
the student wishes to attend an alternative school. 28
(2) The establishment of district capacity limits by grade 29
level, and school building, and education program; . Each school 30
district shall determine the number of remaining vacancies in 31
each grade level and school building and post the numbers on its 32
web site every twelve weeks. 33
(3) A requirement that the school district continue to 34
approve applications to enroll in each alternative school that 35
has not reached its capacity limit; 36
(4) A requirement that students enrolled in a school 37
building or living in any attendance area of the school building 38
established by the superintendent or board be given preference 39
over applicants; 40
(4)(5) Procedures to ensure that an appropriate racial 41
balance is maintained in the district schools. 42
Each policy may permit a student to permanently transfer 43
to an alternative school so that the student need not reapply 44
annually for permission to attend the alternative school. 45
(C) Except as provided in section 3313.982 of the Revised 46

H. B. No. 294 Page 3
As Introduced
Code, the procedures for admitting applicants to alternative 47
schools shall not include: 48
(1) Any requirement of academic ability, or any level of 49
athletic, artistic, or other extracurricular skills; 50
(2) Limitations on admitting applicants because of 51
disabling conditions, except that a board may require a student 52
receiving services under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code to 53
attend school where the services described in the student's IEP 54
are available; 55
(3) A requirement that the student be proficient in the 56
English language; 57
(4) Rejection of any applicant because the student has 58
been subject to disciplinary proceedings, except that if an 59
applicant has been suspended or expelled for ten consecutive 60
days or more in the term for which admission is sought or in the 61
term immediately preceding the term for which admission is 62
sought, the procedures may include a provision denying admission 63
of such applicant to an alternative school; 64
(5) Rejection of any applicant based on the student's 65
residential address, race, gender, religion, or socioeconomic 66
status. 67
(D)(1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3327. of the Revised Code, 68
and except as provided in division (D)(2) of this section, a 69
district board is not required to provide transportation to a 70
nondisabled student enrolled in an alternative school unless 71
such student can be picked up and dropped off at a regular 72
school bus stop designated in accordance with the board's 73
transportation policy or unless the board is required to provide 74
additional transportation to the student in accordance with a 75

H. B. No. 294 Page 4
As Introduced
court-approved desegregation plan. 76
(2) A district board shall provide transportation to any 77
student described in 20 U.S.C. 6316(b)(1)(F) to the extent 78
required by division (D) of section 3302.04 of the Revised Code, 79
except that no district board shall be required to provide 80
transportation to any such student after the school in which the 81
student was enrolled immediately prior to enrolling in the 82
alternative school makes adequate yearly progress, as defined in 83
section 3302.01 of the Revised Code, for two consecutive school 84
years. 85
(E) Each school board shall provide information about the 86
policy adopted under this section and the application procedures 87
and deadlines to the parent of each student in the district and 88
to the general public. Each school board also shall publish the 89
policy on its public web site. 90
(F) No school board shall impose tuition or fees for a 91
student who enrolls in an alternative school under this section 92
that exceeds the tuition or fees charged to students assigned to 93
the school building by the district superintendent. 94
(G) A student's parent or guardian may appeal a school 95
district's decision to deny the student's application to open 96
enroll in an alternative school to the department of education 97
and workforce. The department shall respond to an appeal within 98
ninety days of receiving it. 99
(H) The department of education and workforce shall 100
monitor school districts to ensure compliance with this section 101
and the districts' policies. 102
(I) Each school district annually shall report to the 103
department all of the following: 104

H. B. No. 294 Page 5
As Introduced
(1) The total number of open enrollment applications 105
received under division (B) of this section; 106
(2) The total number of accepted applications; 107
(3) The total number of denied applications; 108
(4) The reason for each denied application. 109
The department annually shall publish the information 110
reported under this division on its web site. 111
Section 2. That existing section 3313.97 of the Revised 112
Code is hereby repealed. 113